Washington statutes.
RCW 17.28.430

Dissolution—Result of election to be certified—Certificate of dissolution.

Should two-thirds or more of the votes at the election favor dissolution the district board shall certify that fact to the secretary of state. Upon receipt of such certification the secretary of state shall issue his or her certificate reciting that the district (naming it) has been dissolved, and shall transmit to and file a copy with the county clerk of each county in which any portion of the district is situated.

After the date of the certificate of the secretary of state, the district is dissolved.

[ 2011 c 336 s 470; 1957 c 153 s 43.]